Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.160

Penalty for taking illegal fees.

If any officer takes more or greater fees than are allowed by law he or she shall be subject to prosecution, and on conviction, shall be removed from office and fined in a sum not exceeding one thousand dollars.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4021; 1963 c 4 s 36.18.160. Prior: Code 1881 s 2090; 1869 p 373 s 12; RRS s 4225. Cf. RCW 9.33.040.]